phon-buffer.xfst
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! Buffer vowel/consonant processing
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------

define bufferCons ⟪bs⟫|⟪bş⟫|⟪by⟫|⟪bn⟫;
define bufferVowel ⟪bA⟫|⟪bI⟫;
define consonant  @"consonant.a";
define consonantAll  consonant|⟪c⟫|⟪p⟫|⟪t⟫|⟪k⟫|⟪g⟫|⟪K⟫|⟪D⟫|⟪C⟫|⟪L⟫;
define vowel  @"vowel.a";
define vowelAll  vowel|⟪I⟫|⟪A⟫;

regex  ⟪by⟫ -> 0 || .#. i ⟪RB⟫ _ , _ [⟪MB⟫|⟪IGB⟫]* .#.
   ,,  ⟪bş⟫ -> ş || .#. {yarım} ⟪RB⟫ _
   .o. bufferVowel -> 0 || vowelAll [\[consonantAll|⟪caus⟫]]* _ ,,
       bufferCons  -> 0 || [consonantAll|⟪caus⟫] [\vowelAll]* _
   .o. ⟪bI⟫ -> ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟪bA⟫ -> ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟪bs⟫ -> s
    ,, ⟪bş⟫ -> ş
    ,, ⟪by⟫ -> y
    ,, ⟪bn⟫ -> n
;
